Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.070

Obligations of commission—Limitations on liabilities or claims—State—Individual capacity.

Obligations incurred by the commission and liabilities or claims against the commission may be enforced only against the assets of the commission in the same manner as if it were a corporation and no liability for the debts or actions of the commission exists against either the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof or against any member, officer, employee, or agent of the commission in his or her individual capacity. The members of the commission, including employees of the commission, may not be held responsible individually or any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employees, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. A person or employee may not be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other members of the commission.

[ 2001 c 314 s 7.]